Massachusetts, session 194th, H497.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3I of chapter 23A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2010
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “municipalities”, in line 4, the
following:- or nonprofit organization
SECTION 2. Said section 3I of chapter 23A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting, after the word “municipality”, in line 15, the following:- or nonprofit organization
SECTION 3. Said section 3I of chapter 23A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting, after the words “city or town”, in line 28, the following:- or nonprofit organization.
of 1